fst/morphology/phonology/derivation-phonology.xfscript
! Phonology 

define dimRule [ t -> c || _ ?* %/  [ i s ( i s ) | s i ] [ %/ | .#. ] ] ;

define ên2ânRule [ ê -> â || %/ _ %/ n %/ ] ; 

! T > s / _ i, i:
! t > c / _ i, i:
! T, t > t / _ e (> i), elsewhere

define TsRule [ T -> s || _ %/ [ i | î ] ] ;

define tcRule [ t -> c || _ %/ [ i | î ] ] ;

define tc2Rule [ t (->) c || _ %/ [ i | î ] ] ;

define TtRule [ T -> t ] ;

!! Distribution of S/S2 elements in CW
! 55	S -> h || a _ / t(c), .#. o _ / t, (i) _ / t, a _ / t
!  4	S -> s || a _ / i, a _ > (am)
! 66	S2 -> t || s2 / _ / ê, w(i) / _ / ê, (i) / _ / ê
!  6	S2 -> h || â / _ / t, w(i) / _ / t
!  2	S2 -> t(c) || (i) / _ / ê

define S2hsRule [ S -> h || _ %/ t ,, S -> s || a _ %/ i , a _ %> a ] ;

define S2htRule [ "S2" -> h || _ %/ t ,, "S2" -> t || _ %/ ê ] ;

define e2iRule [ e -> i || %/ _ ] ;

define CiCEpenthesisRule [ %/ -> %/ i  || [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t | w | y | ý ]  _ [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t | y | ý | S | "S2" ] ] ;

! define wiwEpenthesisRule [ %/ (->) %/ i  || w _ w ] ;

define wiwEpenthesisRule [ [ w %/ w ] (->) [ w %/ i w ] ] ;

! VG-i > V̅

define aGiRule [ [ a | â ] [ w | y | ý ] %/ i -> â %/ ] ;

define eGiRule [ ê [ w | y | ý ] %/ i -> ê %/ ] ;

define iGiRule [ [ i | î ] [ w | y | ý ] %/ [ i | î ] -> î %/ ] ;

define oGiRule [ [ o | ô ] [ w | y | ý ] %/ i -> ô %/ ] ;

! Same vowel collapses rules

define aCollapseRule [ [ a | â ] %/ [ a | â ] -> â %/ ] ;

define eCollapseRule [ ê %/ ê -> ê ] ;

define iCollapseRule [ [ i | î ] %/ [ i | î ] -> î %/ ] ;

define oCollapseRule [ [ o | ô ] %/ [ o | ô ] -> ô %/ ] ;

! Morpheme-final w-

! Cw-iC > CoC

define CwiC2CoCRule  [ w %/ i -> o %/ || [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t ] _ ( "^DIM" ) [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t | w | %/ ] ] ;

! Cw-ô > Cô

define Cwoo2CooRule [ w %/ ô  -> ô %/ || [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t ] _ ] ;

! Cw-o > C{o,ô}

define Cwo2Coo2Rule [ [ w %/ o ] -> [ [ o | ô ] %/ ] || [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t ] _ ] ;

! Cw-wV > CwV

define ww2wRule [ [ w %/ w ] -> w %/  || [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t ] _ [ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ] ] ;

! Morpheme-final y- to be explored
! Cy-yV > CyV ??? 

! {m,n} > h / __ -{p,t,k} OR Ø > i / {m,n} __ -{p,t,k,c} 

define N2hRule [ [ m | n ] -> h || _ %/ [ p | t | k | c ] ] ;

! Reducing one of cross-boundary vowel pairs

define iBiRule [ [ i | î ] -> 0 || _ %/ [ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ] , [ a | â | ê | o | ô ] %/ _ ] ;

define VBVRule [ [ a | â | ê | o | ô ] -> 0 || _ %/ [ a | â | ê | o | ô ] ] ;

! define boundaryRule [ [ %/ ]+ -> 0 ] ;
define boundaryRule [ [ %/ ]+ -> %/ ] ;

! Normalizing special characters

define NormRule [ T -> t , S -> s , "S2" -> s , "s2" -> s ] ;

define rmBoundary  [ %/ -> 0 || .#. _ ] .o. [ %/ -> 0 || _ .#. ] ;

! Removing excessive sequences of morphemic syllables consisting only of vowels and glides (three or more)

define Vowel [ a | â | e | ê | i | î | o | ô ] ;

define Glide [ w | y | ý ] ;

define VGsyll [ Vowel | Glide ]+ ;

define VGfilter ~[ $[ [ VGsyll "/" Vsyll "/" VGsyll "/" ] | [ "/" VGsyll "/" VGsyll "/" VGsyll ] ] ];

read regex [ VGfilter
! .o. dimRule
.o. ên2ânRule
.o. TsRule
.o. tcRule
.o. TtRule
.o. e2iRule
.o. CiCEpenthesisRule
.o. wiwEpenthesisRule
.o. S2hsRule ! S
.o. S2htRule ! S2
.o. aGiRule
.o. eGiRule
.o. iGiRule
.o. oGiRule
.o. aCollapseRule
.o. eCollapseRule
.o. iCollapseRule
.o. oCollapseRule
.o. CwiC2CoCRule
.o. Cwoo2CooRule
.o. Cwo2Coo2Rule
.o. ww2wRule 
.o. N2hRule
.o. tc2Rule
.o. iBiRule
.o. VBVRule
.o. NormRule
.o. boundaryRule
! .o. rmBoundary
] ;

! define DrvPhon
